Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-2902
Purpose.

The purpose of the Political Subdivisions Construction Alternatives Act is to authorize a political subdivision to enter into a design-build contract which is subject to qualification-based selection, a construction management at risk contract, or a public-private partnership contract for a public project if the political subdivision adheres to the procedures set forth in the act.

Laws 2002, LB 391, § 2; R.S.1943, (2003), § 79-2002;

Laws 2008, LB889, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 41.
July 18, 2026